New York, session 2025-2026, S5510.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The New York state energy research and development author- 2 ity, in consultation with the department of public service and the divi- 3 sion of homeland security and emergency services, shall prepare a report 4 including recommendations regarding the establishment of microgrids for 5 protection of critical facilities in the state of New York. For purposes 6 of this act, the term "microgrid" shall mean a group of interconnected 7 loads and distributed energy resources within clearly defined electrical 8 boundaries that acts as a single controllable entity with respect to the 9 grid and can connect and disconnect from the grid to enable it to oper- 10 ate in both grid-connected or island-mode. Specifically, the authority 11 shall develop recommendations which include, but are not limited to, the 12 following: 13 (a) Whether microgrids should be established at hospitals, first 14 responder headquarters, such as police and fire stations, emergency 15 shelters, schools, water filtration plants, sewage treatment plants and 16 other critical facilities in the state of New York; 17 (b) The geographic areas in the state of New York where the establish- 18 ment of microgrids should be a priority, based upon prior severe storm 19 damage and the consideration of disadvantaged communities as defined in 20 subdivision 5 of section 75-0101 of the environmental conservation law; 21 and 22 (c) Available or necessary funding mechanisms for the establishment of 23 microgrids. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03857-01-5 S. 5510 2 1 § 2. The authority shall submit the final report of recommendations to 2 the governor, the temporary president of the senate and the speaker of 3 the assembly within one year after the effective date of this act. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.